dictionaries/gl_ES/index.dic
SFX 201 ar áras/666,100,112,113 ar . is:antepretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 201 ar áses/666,100,112,113 ar . is:subxuntivo pretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 202 r s/666,100,112,113 ar . is:presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 202 ar ues/666,100,112,113 gar . is:subxuntivo presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 205 ar ás/100,112,113 ar . is:presente P2 [ + enclítico]
SFX 205 ar ivéches/666,100,112,113 tar . is:pretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 205 ar éras/666,100,112,113 dar . is:antepretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 205 0 ás/113 ar . is:futuro P2 [ + enclítico polisílabo]
SFX 205 ar éas/666,100,112,113 ar . is:subxuntivo presente P2 + clíticos
SFX 205 ar ivéres/666,100,112,113 tar . is:subxuntivo futuro P2 + enclítico
SFX 205 ar áres/666,100,112,113 ar . is:infinitivo P2 + enclítico
SFX 310 0 á/113,115 er . is:futuro P3 [ + enclítico polisílabo]
SFX 310 0 ían/100,112,113,114,115 er . is:pospretérito P6 [ + enclítico]
SFX 312 er éras/666,100,112,113 er . is: antepretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 313 er és/666,113 er . is:presente P2 + enclítico polisílabo
SFX 315 er as/666,100,112,113 [^cuáó]er . is:subxuntivo presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 315 quer cas/666,100,112,113 quer . is:subxuntivo presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 322 rer s/666,113 érer . is:presente P2 + enclítico polisílabo
SFX 322 er és/666,113 ver . is:presente P2 + enclítico polisílabo
SFX 323 ir íres/666,100,112,113 ir . is:subxuntivo futuro P2 + enclítico
SFX 324 er íches/666,100,112,113 valer . is:pretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 324 or óras/666,100,112,113 or . is:antepretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 324 or óses/666,100,112,113 or . is:subxuntivo pretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 324 ir íses/666,100,112,113 ir . is:subxuntivo pretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 327 0 ías/100,112,113 r . is:pospretérito P2 [ + enclítico]
SFX 329 er énde/666,100,112,113 ter . is:imperativo P5 + enclítico
SFX 330 iñer íñas/666,100,112,113 tiñer . is:copretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 332 oñer ós/113 poñer . is:presente P2 [ + enclítico polisílabo]
SFX 332 er és/113 ver . is:presente P2 [ + enclítico polisílabo]
SFX 340 r s/666,100,112,113 [^f]ácer . is:presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 340 r s/666,100,112,113 [^h]áber . is:presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 342 er as/666,100,112,113 [^cáó]er . is:subxuntivo presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 351 or úñas/666,100,112,113 or . is:copretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 351 0 óres/666,100,112,113 or . is:infinitivo P2 + enclítico
SFX 360 0 ían/100,112,113,114,115 er . is:pospretérito P6 [ + enclítico]
SFX 362 0 á/113,115 er . is:futuro P3 [ + enclítico polisílabo]
SFX 362 er éras/666,100,112,113 er . is: antepretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 600 0 ás/113 ir . is:futuro P2 [ + enclítico polisílabo]
SFX 602 ir as/666,100,112,113 [^cu]ir . is:subxuntivo presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 603 ir ías/100,112,113 rir . is:copretérito / subxuntivo presente P2 [ + enclítico]
SFX 605 unir únas/100,112,113 unir . is:subxuntivo presente P2 [ + enclítico]
SFX 613 oír óes/666,100,112,113 oír . is:presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 613 ír íches/100,112,113 ír . is:pretérito P2
SFX 613 aír áias/666,100,112,113 aír . is:subxuntivo presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 613 0 es/100,112,113 ír . is:infinitivo / subxuntivo futuro P2 + enclítico
SFX 615 ir as/666,100,112,113 [^cu]ir . is:subxuntivo presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 617 ir es/666,100,112,113 ir . is:presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 624 ir e/666,100,112,113 [^cu]ir . is:imperativo P2 + enclítico
SFX 630 0 ás/113 r . is:futuro P2 [ + enclítico polisílabo]
SFX 632 or úches/666,100,112,113 r . is:pretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 633 air ás/666,113 ir . is:presente P2 + enclítico polisílabo
SFX 637 ir ías/100,112,113 ir . is:copretérito P2 [ + enclítico]
SFX 639 er éches/666,100,112,113 r . is:pretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 640 ir íñas/666,100,112,113 ir . is:copretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 640 ir éñas/666,100,112,113 ir . is:subxuntivo presente P2 + enclítico
SFX 644 er éras/666,100,112,113 r . is:antepretérito P2 + enclítico
SFX 658 ir íras/666,100,112,113 ir . is:antepretérito P2
SFX 658 ir íres/666,100,112,113 ir . is:infinitivo / subxuntivo futuro P2 + enclítico
